District of Columbia statutes.
42-2603

Availability; use prescribed by Mayor.

The Fund shall be available without fiscal year limitation for the purpose of providing financial assistance for down payments or interim financing to recipients for the purpose of purchasing or securing housing, including single family homes, condominium units, or occupancy rights to cooperative housing in the District of Columbia as their principal place of residence and of providing financial assistance to District of Columbia government employees eligible under the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Program to purchase a home in the District of Columbia. Under terms and conditions prescribed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia (“Mayor”), the Fund shall be used for making loans and providing other forms of financial assistance. The assistance provided pursuant to the Fund may be used in conjunction with other available home assistance programs.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-103, § 4, 25 DCR 1977
Oct. 24, 1981, D.C. Law 4-44, § 2(c), 28 DCR 4265
June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-118, § 8(c), 39 DCR 3189
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1101, 44 DCR 7378
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-96, § 9(c), 47 DCR 1081

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2203.
1973 Ed., § 45-1803.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-96 rewrote the first sentence which formerly provided: “The Fund shall be available without fiscal year limitation for the purpose of providing financial assistance for down payments or interim financing to recipients for the purpose of purchasing or securing housing, including single family homes, condominium units, or occupancy rights to cooperative housing in the District of Columbia as their principal place of residence and of providing financial assistance to District of Columbia government employees eligible under the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Program to purchase a home in the District of Columbia.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(c) of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-188, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10407).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(c) of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-258, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1124).

Repeal of Law

Repeal of Law 9-118

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 12-60 repealed the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Act of 1992, D.C. Law 9-118.

Editor's Notes

Section 11 of D.C. Law 13-96 provided: “This act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.”